Hawaii statutes.
[PART VII.]
ROUTINE REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE

Cross References

Judiciary-owned buildings and facilities; routine repair and
maintenance annual reports, see §601-2.

[§37-121] Routine repair and
maintenance; definitions. As used in this part:

"Routine repair and maintenance"
means repair and maintenance performed on a scheduled repair and maintenance
cycle.

"State-owned building, facility, or other
improvement" means a building, facility, or other improvement owned and
managed by a state executive agency. The term shall not include a state-owned
building, facility, or other improvement that is leased by a state executive
agency to a person. [L 2016, c 233, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next